5c1t/Computer Models of Natural Language/homeworks/3-foma/english.foma
def ParallelForms   [ [ {cactus}    "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {cacti}     ] |
                      [ {formula}   "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {formulae}  ] |
                      [ {person}    "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {people}    ] ];

def Latin           [ [ {alga}      "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {algae}     ] |
                      [ {fungus}    "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {fungi}     ] |
                      [ {datum}     "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {data}      ] ];

def Exceptions      [ [ {tooth}     "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {teeth}     ] |
                      [ {man}       "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {men}       ] |
                      [ {woman}     "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {women}     ] |
                      [ {ox}        "+N" "+Pl"  .x. {oxen}      ] ];

def Vowel           [ a | e | i | o | u ];
def Consonant       [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z ];
def Letter          [ Vowel | Consonant ];
def Word            Letter+;
def WordWithTags    Word "+N" ["+Sg" | "+Pl"];

def TagRemoval      "+N" "+Sg"  -> "$"      || _ ,,
                    "+N" "+Pl"  -> "$" s    || _ ;
def YReplacement    y           -> i e      || Consonant _ "$" s ;
def EInsertion      [..]        -> e        || s | s s | c h | s h | x | z _ "$" s ;
def Cleanup         "$"         -> 0        || _ ;

def Grammar WordWithTags    .o.
            TagRemoval      .o.
            YReplacement    .o.
            EInsertion      .o.
            Cleanup;

regex Exceptions .P. [ Latin .P. [ Grammar | ParallelForms ] ];
